California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) If a lender, surety, or other person supplies funds to or for the account of an employer for the specific purpose of paying wages of the employees of the employer, with actual notice or knowledge that the employer does not intend to or will not be able to make timely payment or deposit of the amounts of tax required by this part to be deducted and withheld by the employer from those wages, the lender, surety, or other person shall be liable in his or her own person and estate to the State of California in a sum equal to the taxes (together with interest) which are not paid over to this state by the employer with respect to the wages. However, the liability of the lender, surety, or other person shall be limited to an amount equal to 25 percent of the amount so supplied to or for the account of the employer for that purpose.

(c) Any amounts paid to
 this state pursuant to this section shall be credited against the liability of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Voluntary Contributions [18700. - 18901.9.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18700. - 18703.]

18700.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, established by Section 18701. That designation is to be used as a voluntary checkoff on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that
 taxable year, and once made is irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made. If no designee is specified, the contribution shall be transferred to the General Fund, after reimbursement of the direct actual costs of the Franchise Tax Board for the collection and administration of funds under this article.

(d) If an individual designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available for designation is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) When another voluntary contribution designation is removed from the tax return, or as soon as space is available, whichever occurs first, the Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the tax return to include a space labeled the “Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation provided. The form shall include in the instruction information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to support the Richard Paul Hemann Parkinson’s Disease
 Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.6 (commencing with Section 103870) of Part 2 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18703.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18703, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18701.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18700. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18700 to be transferred to the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18700 for payment into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18703.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18703, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18702.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) The revenues remaining, after allocation pursuant to paragraph (1), to the State Department of Public Health for the purposes of administering the
 Richard Paul Hemann Parkinson’s Disease Program pursuant to Chapter 1.6 (commencing with Section 103870) of Part 2 of Division 102 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The State Department of Public Health shall comply with the internet website reporting requirements described in Section 18873.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18703.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18703, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18703.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain operative only until January 1 of the seventh calendar year following the first appearance of the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund on the tax return, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the Parkinson’s Disease Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be
 received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year. The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and shall be repealed on December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 99, Sec. 2.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed on December 1 of the year prescribed in subd. (a) or subd. (b).   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 1, commencing with Section 18700.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18720. - 18723.]

18720.

(a) Any individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, established pursuant to Section 18721. That designation is to be used as a voluntary checkoff on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and
 credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) In the event a taxpayer designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available for designation is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) When another voluntary contribution designation is removed from the tax return, or as soon as space is available, whichever occurs first,
 the Franchise Tax Board shall revise the forms of the return to include a space labeled the “California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The forms shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to support research relating to the cure, screening, and treatment of pediatric cancers.

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18723.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18723, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18721.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18720. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18720 to be transferred to the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18720 for payment
 into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18723.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18723, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18722.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the Regents of the University of California for distribution of grants for the purposes of conducting research on the causes and treatments for pediatric cancer and expanding community-based education
 on pediatric cancer. The Regents of the University of California may use up to 5 percent of the money allocated to them for administering and promoting the program.

(b) The Legislature requests the Regents of the University of California to report on its internet website the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an itemization of how program funds were awarded, including, but not limited to, information regarding recipients of funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18723.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18723, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18723.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain operative only until January 1 of the seventh calendar year following the first appearance of the California Pediatric Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund on the tax return, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and each subsequent calendar year that the California Pediatric Cancer Research
 Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (3). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and is repealed on December 1 of
 that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   (AB 703)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed on December 1 of the year prescribed in subd. (a) or subd. (b).   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 3, commencing with Section 18720.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18730. - 18733.]

18730.

(a) Any individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established by Section 18731 to be used to conduct the sessions of the California Senior Legislature and to support its ongoing activities on behalf of older persons.

(b) The contribution shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on the joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other
 credits associated with the individual’s account, do not exceed the individual’s tax liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return for taxable years 2017 to 2030, inclusive, to include a space labeled “California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to conduct the sessions of the California Senior Legislature and to support its ongoing activities on behalf of older persons.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 89, Sec. 1.   (AB 559)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative on January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18733.    Repealed on December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18733.)
-------------------------------------------

18731.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18730. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have
 designated pursuant to Section 18730 to be transferred to the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18730 for payment into that fund.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund is the successor fund of the California Senior Legislature Fund. All assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenditures of the California Senior Legislature Fund shall be transferred to, and become a part of, the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, as provided in Section 16346 of the Government Code. Any references in state law to the California Senior Legislature Fund shall be construed to refer to the California Senior
 Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (AB 519)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18733.   Repealed on December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18733.)
-------------------------------------------

18732.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys transferred to the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund pursuant to Section 18731 shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Controller and the Franchise Tax Board for
 reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Controller and the Franchise Tax Board in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) The balance to the California Senior Legislature, for its ongoing activities on behalf of older persons. The California Senior Legislature shall use at least 10 percent of this balance for purposes of marketing and promoting the fund.

(b) All moneys allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be carried over from the year in which they were received and encumbered in any following year.

(c) The funds allocated to the California Senior Legislature for the purpose of funding the activities of the California Senior Legislature shall be spent pursuant to the purview of the Joint Rules Committee of the California Senior Legislature in a manner consistent with the bylaws
 of the California Senior Legislature, established through a majority vote of the California Senior Legislature.

(d) The California Senior Legislature’s Internet Web site shall report the goals of the organization, the number of and summary of bills proposed by the California Senior Legislature, and all events the California Senior Citizen Advocacy Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund supports each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (AB 519)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18733.   Repealed on December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18733.)
-------------------------------------------

18733.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 18873 and Section 18874, this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 89, Sec. 2.   (AB 559)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed on December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.    Note: Termination provisions affect Article 3.6, commencing with Section 18730.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Fish and Game Preservation Fund [18741. - 18744.]

18741.

(a) Any individual may designate on the tax return, under the space labeled “Rare and Endangered Species Preservation Voluntary Tax Contribution Program,” that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account established in the Fish and Game
 Preservation Fund pursuant to Section 1770 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) The contribution shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled “Rare and Endangered Species Preservation Voluntary Tax Contribution Program” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a).

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   (AB 1031)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18744.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18744.)
-------------------------------------------

18742.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of moneys paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund moneys that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18741 to be transferred to the Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account. The Controller shall
 transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to that account, an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts reported to the Controller by the Franchise Tax Board that have been designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18741 for payment into that account.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys transferred to the account shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for the reimbursement of all actual and direct costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with the collection and administration of funds under this article.

(2) To the Department of Fish and Wildlife for the purposes specified in Section 1771 of the Fish and Game Code.

(c) The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall comply with the Internet Web site reporting requirements described in Section 18873.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 504, Sec. 3.   (AB 1031)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18744.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18744.)
-------------------------------------------

18743.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this article create an additional funding source for programs for endangered and rare animals and native plant species and shall be used to supplement, not supplant, other funding sources for these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 594, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18744.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18744.)
-------------------------------------------

18744.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain operative only until January 1, 2032, and as of December 1 of that year is repealed.

(b) (1) By September 1, 2006, and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the Rare and Endangered Species Preservation Voluntary Tax Contribution Program appears on a tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year. The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual
 amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year, and shall be repealed on December 1 of that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 360, Sec. 4.   (AB 1828)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 5, commencing with Section 18741.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.1. California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account [18745. - 18748.]

18745.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return, under the space titled “Protect Our Coast and Oceans Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund,” that a contribution in excess of tax liability, if any, be made to the California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account established by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5067 of the Vehicle Code. That designation is to
 be used as a voluntary contribution on the tax return.

(b) A contribution shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation made under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the individual’s account, do not exceed the individual’s tax liability, if any, the return shall be treated as though no designation had been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled the “Protect Our Coast and Oceans Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The form shall
 also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used for grants and programs that preserve, protect, or enhance coastal resources and promote coastal and marine educational activities for underserved communities.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   (SB 503)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18748.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18748.)
-------------------------------------------

18746.

The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by individuals in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that individuals have designated pursuant to Section 18745 to be transferred to the California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Beach
 and Coastal Enhancement Account an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18745 for payment into that account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 519, Sec. 2.   (SB 503)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18748.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18748.)
-------------------------------------------

18747.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money designated under the Protect Our Coast and Oceans Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund space on a tax return and transferred to the California Beach and Coastal Enhancement Account pursuant to Section 18745 shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) (A) To the California Coastal Commission to support eligible programs awarded grants under the selection criteria established by the California Coastal Commission for the Whale Tail Grants Program, and for direct program-related expenses.

(B) All moneys allocated pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be carried over from the year in which they were received.

(b) The California Coastal Commission shall comply with the Internet Web site reporting requirements described in Section 18873.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 519, Sec. 3.   (SB 503)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18748.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18748.)
-------------------------------------------

18748.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the 2018 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter that the Protect Our Coast and Oceans Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (3). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received
 by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year, and shall be repealed on December 1 of that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1000, Sec. 4.   (AB 178)   Effective September 30, 2024.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 5.1, commencing with Section 18745.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.2. Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18749. - 18749.3.]

18749.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, established by Section 18749.1. That designation is to be used as a voluntary checkoff on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made is irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other
 credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made. If no designee is specified, the contribution shall be transferred to the General Fund, after reimbursement of the direct actual costs of the Franchise Tax Board for the collection and administration of funds under this article.

(d) If an individual designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available for designation is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) When another voluntary contribution designation is removed from the tax return, or as soon as space is available, whichever occurs
 first, the Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the tax return to include a space labeled the “Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation provided. The form shall include in the instruction information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to support the rehabilitation of injured, sick, or orphaned native wildlife and for wildlife conservation education.

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 360, Sec. 5.   (AB 1828)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed in Section 18749.3.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 18749.3.)
-------------------------------------------

18749.1.

There is in the State Treasury the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18749. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18749 to be transferred to the Native California Wildlife
 Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18749 for payment into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 504, Sec. 5.   (AB 1031)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed in Section 18749.3.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 18749.3.)
-------------------------------------------

18749.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys transferred to the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and the
 Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) The revenues remaining, after allocation pursuant to paragraph (1), to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for the purposes specified in Article 5 (commencing with Section 1773) of Chapter 7.5 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall comply with the Internet Web site reporting requirements described in Section 18873.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 504, Sec. 5.   (AB 1031)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2031, as prescribed in Section 18749.3.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 18749.3.)
-------------------------------------------

18749.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain operative only until January 1, 2031, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year. The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by
 using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and shall be repealed on December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand
 dollars ($250,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 360, Sec. 6.   (AB 1828)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 5.2, commencing with Section 18749.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. California Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementia Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18761. - 18766.]

18761.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Alzheimer’s disease and related dementia disorders are devastating health conditions that cause a loss of intellectual functioning so severe that they interfere with an individual’s daily functioning and eventually result in death. These
 conditions cause serious financial, social, and emotional hardships on those affected and on their family caregivers.

(b) Between 2008 and 2030 the number of Californians living with Alzheimer’s disease will double in both the general population and among the African American population. In this same period, there is expected to be a tripling of that disease among California’s Latino and Asian Pacific Islander populations.

(c) Among California’s baby boomers 55 years of age and older, their lifetime risk for developing Alzheimer’s disease is one in eight.

(d) Alzheimer’s disease is now the sixth leading cause of death in California.

(e) Families provide almost three-quarters of the value of care for individuals living with Alzheimer’s disease in the
 community and in facilities, amounting to approximately $72.7 billion out of an estimated total cost of $104 billion. These family caregivers are more likely to experience financial hardship, health difficulties, and a negative impact on their ability to work outside the home.

(f) The cost to the Medi-Cal program for an individual with Alzheimer’s disease or a related dementia is two and one-half times greater than the cost for an individual without a diagnosis of dementia.

(g) While scientists have made great strides in understanding Alzheimer’s disease and other causes of dementia, there is no known prevention or cure at this time.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to establish a systematic program for the conduct of research regarding the cause, prevention, diagnosis, cure, and
 treatment of Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders. The outcome of this research may have direct effects and consequences on the development of a comprehensive system that will provide diagnoses and treatment to victims of those health problems. This program shall award grants to eligible physicians, hospitals, laboratories, educational institutions, and other organizations and persons for the purpose of enabling those organizations and persons to conduct research.
